Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6850
Settlement, negotiation; mediation, when.

(1) If an insurer or an out-of-network health care provider provides notification that it considers a claim or payment to be not reasonable, the insurer and the health care provider shall have thirty days after the date of such notification to negotiate a settlement. If a settlement has not been reached after such thirty-day period, the insurer and the health care provider shall engage in mediation in accordance with the Uniform Mediation Act. The insurer may attempt to negotiate a final reimbursement amount with the out-of-network health care provider which differs from the amount paid by the insurer pursuant to this section.

(2) Following completion of the mediation process, the cost of mediation shall be split evenly and paid by the insurer and the health care provider.

(3) Mediation shall not be used when the insurer and the health care provider agree to a separate payment arrangement.

Laws 2020, LB997, § 17.

Uniform Mediation Act, see section 25-2930.